Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-3602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act:

(1) Community-based provider means a nonprofit or local governmental entity contracting with the Department of Health and Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Services, or the Office of Probation Administration to deliver services for youth transitioning from congregate care placements or probation supervision, including mentoring and employment support;

(2) Credible messenger means an individual who has lived experience in the justice or foster care system and who is trained in mentorship and restorative justice practices;

(3) Facility means a juvenile detention facility, group home, residential treatment facility, or a youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(4) Individualized employment plan means an age-appropriate, customized career plan that:

(a) Is developed collaboratively by a counselor employed by the State Department of Education, the youth, and a representative of a facility or the Office of Probation Administration, as appropriate; and

(b) Identifies employment, credentialing, and job placement steps for the youth;

(5) Transition plan means a written, individualized plan developed as described in section 43-3605; and

(6) Youth means any individual under nineteen years of age who is exiting or transitioning from a congregate care placement, including at a facility or residential treatment program, or who is transitioning from probation supervision.

Laws 2026, LB962, § 2.
December 1, 2026